Florida, session 2026, SB468.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 26 27 Section 1.âParagraph (qq) is added to subsection (1) of 28 section 474.214, Florida Statutes, to read: 29 474.214âDisciplinary proceedings.â 30 (1)âThe following acts shall constitute grounds for which 31 the disciplinary actions in subsection (2) may be taken: 32 (qq)âFailing to report suspected animal cruelty to the 33 proper authorities pursuant to s. 828.124. 34 Section 2.âParagraph (d) of subsection (4) of section 35 474.2165, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 36 474.2165âOwnership and control of veterinary medical 37 patient records; report or copies of records to be furnished.â 38 (4)âExcept as otherwise provided in this section, such 39 records may not be furnished to, and the medical condition of a 40 patient may not be discussed with, any person other than the 41 client or the clientâs legal representative or other 42 veterinarians involved in the care or treatment of the patient, 43 except upon written authorization of the client. However, such 44 records may be furnished without written authorization under the 45 following circumstances: 46 (d)âIn any criminal action or situation where a 47 veterinarian suspects a criminal violation, including, but not 48 limited to, animal cruelty. If a criminal violation, including 49 but not limited to animal cruelty as defined in s. 828.124, is 50 suspected, a veterinarian may, without notice to or 51 authorization from the client, report the violation to a law 52 enforcement officer, an animal control officer who is certified 53 pursuant to s. 828.27(4)(a), or an agent appointed under s. 54 828.03. However, if a suspected violation occurs at a commercial 55 food-producing animal operation on land classified as 56 agricultural under s. 193.461, the veterinarian must provide 57 notice to the client or the clientâs legal representative before 58 reporting the suspected violation to an officer or agent under 59 this paragraph. The report may not include written medical 60 records except upon the issuance of an order from a court of 61 competent jurisdiction. 62 Section 3.âSection 828.124, Florida Statutes, is created to 63 read: 64 828.124âReporting animal cruelty; medical records.â 65 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 66 (a)ââAnimal crueltyâ means any act or omission that 67 constitutes a violation of s. 828.12, s. 828.122, s. 828.126, or 68 s. 828.13. 69 (b)ââAnimal treatment providerâ includes: 70 1.âAny animal care facility, hospital, mobile service or 71 clinic, or shelter; 72 2.âA private veterinary practice; 73 3.âA college of veterinary medicine or veterinary 74 technology program; 75 4.âA specialized veterinary hospital; or 76 5.âAny place dogs or cats are seen for any kind of 77 treatment. 78 (c)ââGood faith reportâ means a report of animal cruelty 79 which is made by a person without malice or consideration of 80 personal benefit who has probable cause to believe such a report 81 is true. 82 (2)âAll of the following individuals must report suspected, 83 both past or ongoing, incidents of animal cruelty to a local law 84 enforcement officer, an animal control officer certified 85 pursuant to s. 828.27(4)(a), or an agent appointed under s. 86 828.03: 87 (a)âA veterinarian, if he or she has a 88 veterinarian/client/patient relationship with the animal. 89 (b)âA veterinary technician employed by an animal treatment 90 provider or any other employee of the animal treatment provider, 91 if the animal is a past or current patient of the animal 92 treatment provider with whom the technician or employee is 93 employed. 94 (3)âA veterinarian, veterinary technician, or other animal 95 treatment provider employee who makes a good faith report of 96 animal cruelty pursuant to this section to a local law 97 enforcement officer, an animal control officer, or an agent 98 appointed pursuant to subsection (2) shall be held harmless from 99 criminal liability, civil liability, professional disciplinary 100 action, and employer retaliation. 101 (4)âA veterinarian, excluding veterinarians subject to 102 chapter 474, a veterinary technician, or an animal treatment 103 provider employee or volunteer, who knowingly alters or destroys 104 a medical record for the purpose of concealing or attempting to 105 conceal animal cruelty or who causes the same to be done, 106 commits a misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as 107 provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 108 (5)âThis section may not be construed to prohibit any 109 person from making a good faith report of suspected animal 110 cruelty to any national, state, or local law enforcement 111 authority or any animal control agency. 112 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.